Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB821.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 174.080 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to carry out the duties of this chapter and to comply with federal laws
regarding the use of federal transportation funds[not inconsistent with the provisions of
1974 Acts ch. 74.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall adopt such administrative regulations and
procedures consistent with the provisions of KRS 56.610 to 56.760 as it deems
necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of KRS 56.610 to 56.760 with
regard to requirements of the Department of Highways as provided for in KRS
Chapters 175, 176, 177 and 180].
Section 2. KRS 186.860 is amended to read as follows:
The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the commissioner of the Department of
Vehicle Regulation, or a duly authorized agent, is hereby authorized and directed to
negotiate with other states for the purpose of developing and joining the "Nonresident
Violator Compact." The department may promulgate regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A concerning the administration of such compact and shall prescribe the
penalties and procedures for the required compliance.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 4:25 PM Jacketed